Washington statutes.
RCW 7.16.240

Certification of verdict—Argument.

If no notice of a motion for a new trial be given, or if given, the motion be denied, the clerk, within five days after rendition of the verdict or denial of the motion, must transmit to the court in which the application for the writ is pending, a certified copy of the verdict attached to the order of trial, after which either party may bring on the argument of the application, upon reasonable notice to the adverse party.

[ 1895 c 65 s 24; RRS s 1022.]